South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S749.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created the Prescription Medicine Study Committee to evaluate methods and strategies to reduce costs of prescription medicines considered critical to the health, well-being, and longevity of the citizens of South Carolina. (B)(1) The committee shall: (a) identify and review innovative methods used in other states, the federal government, and private industry to reduce the cost of prescription medicines, with a primary focus on medications necessary for the treatment or management of diabetes, heart disease, dementia, and other diseases prevalent among South Carolina citizens. (b) evaluate current cost barriers, including pricing structures, supply chains, and the role of pharmacy benefit managers, insurers, and pharmaceutical manufacturers. (c) recommend policy proposals, statutory changes, pilot programs, or regulatory modifications that could result in lower prescription costs without compromising patient safety, access, or quality of care. (d) consider opportunities for state-led initiatives, such as bulk purchasing, state-supported pharmaceutical distribution models, rebate reforms, manufacturer transparency requirements, or other mechanisms used in similar jurisdictions. (e) engage South Carolina consumers, providers, and industry stakeholders through hearings, written submissions, or other information-gathering methods the committee finds beneficial. (2) In fulfilling its duties, the committee may request data, reports, or assistance from any state agency. (D)(1) The Prescription Medicine Study Committee shall be composed of the following members: (a) the Chair of the House Labor, Commerce and Industry Committee, or his designee; (b) the Chair of the Senate Banking and Insurance Committee, or his designee; (c) the Chair of the House Medical, Military, Public and Municipal Affairs Committee, or his designee; (d) the Chair of the Senate Medical Affairs Committee or his designee; (e) the Director of the Department of Insurance or his designee; (f) the Director of the Department of Public Health or his designee; (g) the Executive Director of the South Carolina Public Employee Benefit Authority (PEBA) or his designee; (h) the Director of the South Carolina Medical Association or his designee; (i) the President of the Hospital Association or his designee; (j) one representative of a health plan that does not own, control, or have a stake in a pharmacy benefit manager within the health plan's corporate structure, appointed by the Governor; and (k) one representative of a pharmacy benefits management company, appointed by the Governor. (2) The members shall elect a chair and vice chair from among themselves at the committee's first meeting. (3) The committee shall meet as soon as practicable upon appointment of all members. (4) A majority of members constitutes a quorum. (5) Staff support shall be provided by the appropriate committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate, and by any relevant state agencies as reasonably requested. (6) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but may receive mileage, subsistence, and per diem as provided by state law for legislative committees. (E) The committee shall prepare and submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the General Assembly no later than December 31, 2026. Upon submission of the report, the committee is dissolved unless reauthorized by joint resolution. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----